Washington statutes.
RCW 10.93.200

Firearms—Authority of officers to possess and carry.

(1) A peace officer as defined in RCW 10.120.010 or corrections officer as defined in RCW 43.101.010 employed by a general authority Washington law enforcement agency or a limited authority Washington law enforcement agency, as those terms are defined in RCW 10.93.020, shall have the authority to possess and carry firearms, subject to the written firearms policy created by the agency employing the peace officer or corrections officer.

(2) A law enforcement agency that employs a person who is a lawful permanent resident as defined in RCW 41.04.899 or a person who is a deferred action for childhood arrivals recipient shall ensure that it has a written firearms policy authorizing the possession and carry of firearms by persons employed by that agency as a peace officer as defined in RCW 10.120.010 or a corrections officer as defined in RCW 43.101.010. A firearms policy must comply with any federal law or regulation promulgated by the United States department of justice, bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms, and explosives, or any successor agency, governing possession of a firearm and any related exceptions.

[ 2024 c 330 s 2.]